Hawaii statutes.
§13D-1 Board of trustees; number;
composition. The board of trustees shall be composed of nine members
elected at-large by qualified voters in the State. Of the nine members to be
elected one shall reside on the island of Hawaii; one shall reside on the
island of Maui; and one shall reside on the island of Molokai; one shall reside
on the island of Kauai; and one shall reside on the island of Oahu. [L 1979, c
196, pt of §8; am L 2001, c 55, §3]

Cross References

Constitutional provision, see Const. art. XII, §5.

Law Journals and Reviews

To Dwell on the Earth in Unity: Rice, Arakaki, and the
Growth of Citizenship and Voting Rights in Hawai‘i.
V HBJ No. 13, at pg. 15.

The California Civil Rights Initiative: Why It's Here, Its
Far Reaching Effects, and the Unique Situation in Hawai`i. 22 UH L. Rev. 279.

Matters of Trust: Unanswered Questions After Rice v.
Cayetano. 23 UH L. Rev. 363.

Doe v. Kamehameha Schools: A "Discrete and Insular
Minority" in Hawai‘i
Seventy Years After Carolene Products? 30 UH L. Rev. 295.

Case Notes

State's electoral restriction enacted a race-based voting
qualification; Hawaii's denial of petitioner's right to vote, where petitioner
was not a "Hawaiian", was a clear violation of the Fifteenth
Amendment to the U.S. Constitution. 528 U.S. 495.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next